Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 4 Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987
59-8-413. Inspections. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (e)(5) and Compiler’s Notes.]

The commissioner shall cause to be made such inspections of any coal surface mining and reclamation operations as are necessary to evaluate the administration of the program or to determine whether such operation is in compliance with this part and all regulations and permits issued pursuant to this part, and for such purposes authorized representatives of the commissioner shall have a right of entry to, upon, or through any coal surface mining and reclamation operation, and/or exploratory operation.

The inspections shall be conducted in such manner and frequency as prescribed in regulations promulgated by the commissioner, and no requirement for a search warrant shall be imposed. Any person conducting coal surface mining operations in this state is put on notice that such frequent unannounced warrantless searches will be conducted for the purpose of carrying out this part.

Each permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrances to each coal surface mining and reclamation operation, a clearly visible sign which sets forth the name, business address, and telephone number of the permittee, and the permit number of the coal surface mining and reclamation operations.

Each inspector, upon detection of each violation of any requirement of this part or any regulation or permit issued pursuant to this part, shall immediately inform the operator in writing and shall report in writing any such violation to the commissioner.

Whenever on the basis of any information available to the commissioner, including receipt of information from any person, the commissioner has reason to believe that any person is in violation of any requirement of this part, regulation issued pursuant to this part, or any permit, condition, order, or notice of noncompliance issued under this part, the commissioner shall investigate, and if the violation is confirmed, take appropriate action within ten (10) days (or immediately if proof is provided that an imminent substantial danger exists).

The identity of any person supplying information shall remain confidential if requested by such person.

When an inspection results from information provided to the commissioner by any person, the commissioner shall notify such person when the inspection is proposed to be carried out, and such person shall be allowed to accompany the inspector during the inspection; provided, however, that any person so accompanying the inspector shall comply with all state and federal safety requirements.

Within ten (10) days of the inspection or fifteen (15) days of the complaint if there is no inspection, the commissioner shall send a complete report to the complainant.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

Any person dissatisfied with the action of the commissioner may appeal to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas [See the Compiler's Notes] as provided in [former] § 59-8-321 [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes].

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

Any person dissatisfied with the action of the commissioner may appeal to the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 17; 2018, ch. 839, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former §59-8-321, referred to in this section, concerning the former board of reclamation review, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 2(b). The duties of the former board of reclamation review were transferred to the former water quality control board created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board” for “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas as provided in former §59-8-321” in (e)(5).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

59-8-414. Release of bond. [See contingent amendment to subsection (b) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

The commissioner may release all or part of the bond or deposit when the commissioner is satisfied that the reclamation covered by the bond or deposit or portion thereof has been accomplished as required by this part. Releases and partial releases shall be accomplished as follows:

When the operator completes the backfilling, regrading, topsoiling, drainage control, site preparation, soil treatments, mulching, and initial planting of the vegetative cover in accordance with the approved plan as noted on a completion report, the commissioner shall issue to the operator and the operator's surety a partial release of seventy percent (70%) of the bond. The remaining bond shall be held for one (1) year, at a minimum, to assure that all reclamation requirements have been successfully met;

The permittee shall not be denied access to the mining site for the purposes of completing or maintaining reclamation work because of the expiration of the permittee's lease, until all of the permittee's performance bond has been released.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

If the commissioner disapproves the application for release of the bond or portion thereof, the commissioner shall notify the permittee and the permittee's surety, stating the reasons for disapproval and recommending specific corrective actions necessary to secure the release, and allowing the permittee an opportunity for a hearing before the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas [See the Compiler's Notes]. This notice and recommendation shall be handed to the operator in person, or served by certified mail addressed to the permanent address shown on the application for a permit. The notice shall specify in what respects the operator has failed to comply with this part, or the regulations of the commissioner.

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

If the commissioner disapproves the application for release of the bond or portion thereof, the commissioner shall notify the permittee and the permittee's surety, stating the reasons for disapproval and recommending specific corrective actions necessary to secure the release, and allowing the permittee an opportunity for a hearing before the board. This notice and recommendation shall be handed to the operator in person, or served by certified mail addressed to the permanent address shown on the application for a permit. The notice shall specify in what respects the operator has failed to comply with this part, or the regulations of the commissioner.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 18; 2018, ch. 839, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. The duties of the former board of reclamation review, formerly referred to in this section, were transferred to the former water quality control board, created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by §69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created in § 69-3-104.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board” for “the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” in the first sentence of (b). See the Compiler’s Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Bond requirements, §59-8-408.

59-8-415. Noncompliance.

If an operator violates the requirements of this part or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or the terms of any permit or the terms of any order of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, the commissioner or the designee shall issue a written notice of noncompliance to be delivered in accordance with this section to the operator, fixing a reasonable time for correction.

The total time for abatement under a notice of violation, including all extensions, shall not exceed sixty (60) days from the date of issuance, in accordance with rules promulgated pursuant to this part.

If, upon expiration of the period of time originally fixed or subsequently extended, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee finds that the violation has not been abated, the commissioner or the designee shall immediately order a cessation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations or the portion thereof relevant to the violation.

Such cessation order shall remain in effect until the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines that the violation has been abated, or until modified, vacated, or terminated by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee in accordance with this section.

In the order of cessation, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall determine the steps necessary to abate the violation in the most expeditious manner possible and shall include the necessary measures in the order.

If necessary, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall order suspension or revocation of a permit and forfeiture of the bond according to this part.

The commissioner shall also issue an immediate cease order to any operator mining without a valid permit, or mining an area not covered by a valid permit.

If the commissioner determines that any condition or practice exists, or that the operator is in violation of any requirement of this part or any permit condition required by this part, which condition, practice, or violation also creates an imminent danger to the health and safety of the public, or is causing, or can reasonably be expected to cause, significant and imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commissioner shall immediately order a cessation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations or the portion thereof relevant to the condition, practice, or violation and commence bond forfeiture proceedings.

Such cessation order shall remain in effect until the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines that the condition, practice, or violation has been vacated, or terminated by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (c).

Where the commissioner finds that the ordered cessation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations, or any portion thereof, will not completely abate the imminent danger to health and safety of the public or the significant and imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commissioner shall, in addition to the cessation order, impose affirmative obligations on the operator requiring the operator to take whatever steps the commissioner deems necessary to abate the danger or harm.

Notices and cease orders issued pursuant to this section shall set forth with reasonable specificity the nature of the noncompliance and the remedial action required, the period of time established for abatement, and a reasonable description of the portion of the coal surface mining and reclamation operation to which the notice or cease order applies.

Each notice or cease order issued under this section shall be handed promptly to the operator and/or subcontractor in person, or served by certified mail addressed to the operator and/or subcontractor's permanent address shown on the application for a permit, or where there is no permit, to the operator's last known address, by the commissioner, and all notices or cease orders shall be in writing and shall be signed by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

If such order is not complied with or the operator refuses or fails to correct the violation, the permit may be revoked and the performance bond shall then be forfeited to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

Any notice or cease order issued pursuant to this section may be modified, vacated, or terminated by the commissioner.

If, however, the operator makes no reasonable attempt to abate the violation within the prescribed abatement period, the bond shall be forfeited in accordance with this part.

Any operator who receives any notice of noncompliance or cease order from the commissioner or the commissioner's designee may request a formal review before the board as provided in [former] § 59-8-321 [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes] and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3. Any request for review made pursuant to this section shall be made, in writing, within thirty (30) days from receipt of the notice or order. Failure to forward such request to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee within thirty (30) days from receipt of the notice or order shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest such notice or order.

The court, in issuing any final order in any action brought pursuant to subsection (a), may award costs of litigation (including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees) to any party, whenever the court determines such award is appropriate. The court may, if a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is sought, require the filing of a bond or equivalent security in accordance with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Nothing in this section shall restrict any right which any person (or class of persons) may have under any statute or common law to seek enforcement of this part and the regulations issued pursuant to it, or to seek any other relief.

Any person who is injured in person or property through the violation by any operator of any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to this part may bring an action for damages against the operator (including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees) only in the chancery court of Davidson County, or the chancery court of the county in which the coal mining operation complained of is located. Nothing in this subsection (g) shall affect the rights established by or limits imposed under the Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former §59-8-321, referred to in this section, concerning the former board of reclamation review, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 2(b). The duties of the former board of reclamation review were transferred to the former water quality control board, created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

59-8-416. Permit revocation and bond forfeiture proceedings. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (f)(1) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

Whenever the commissioner determines that remedial action required by any notice of noncompliance or cease order is not being carried out satisfactorily, the commissioner may revoke the permit and commence bond forfeiture proceedings consistent with this section. The commissioner shall recommend such proceedings whenever the remedial action required under a cease order issued pursuant to § 59-8-415(a) is not satisfactorily completed within sixty (60) days of issuance of the cease order.

Permit revocation and bond forfeiture proceedings shall be commenced by issuing a notice of intent to revoke the permit and forfeit the bond.

The notice shall be sent to the permittee and the permittee's surety.

The permittee or the permittee's surety may request a public informal meeting with the commissioner or the commissioner's designee to review the notice of intent. Such meeting must be requested within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice or the meeting will not be held.

All such meetings must be held within twenty (20) days of receipt of the request.

If a person fails to timely request an informal meeting pursuant to subsection (b), the notice of intent shall become the final order of permit revocation and bond forfeiture.

After conducting an informal meeting pursuant to subsection (b), the commissioner or the commissioner's designee may take any of the following actions:

Issue a final order of permit revocation and bond forfeiture;

Withdraw revocation and forfeiture proceedings; or

Enter into an agreement with the permittee or the permittee's surety for complete reclamation, under the following conditions:

No such agreement may exceed thirty (30) days for backfilling, grading, and initial seeding; and

If the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines that the agreement is not being complied with, either person may issue a final order of permit revocation and bond forfeiture.

When a notice of intent to revoke the permit and forfeit the bond becomes final because of failure to appeal, or if the commissioner issues a final order to revoke the permit and forfeit the bond, the permittee shall immediately tender or cause to be tendered the bond to the commissioner.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

Any person, who is aggrieved by a final order of revocation and forfeiture, may appeal the decision to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas [See the Compiler's Notes] pursuant to [former] § 59-8-321(g) [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes].

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

Such person shall make a request for appeal and tender the amount of the bond to the commissioner within thirty (30) days from service of the final order.

If the bond is other than cash, the bond must be converted to cash and deposited with the commissioner.

Failure to request an appeal and submit the bond amount within thirty (30) days shall result in a waiver of all rights to contest the permit revocation and bond forfeiture and any underlying violations which may have led to the revocation and forfeiture.

After the permit is revoked and the bond is forfeited, the commissioner may collect the bond. If judicial action is required to collect the bond, it shall be the duty of the attorney general and reporter upon request of the commissioner to take appropriate action to collect the bond.

All proceeds from the bonds shall be placed in the surface mining reclamation fund established in § 59-8-303.

The commissioner is authorized once the bond is tendered or otherwise collected to use the proceeds for such reclamation as is necessary, regardless of whether or not an appeal is requested or hearing is pending. If, through administrative or judicial review, it is determined that no violation occurred or that the bond should otherwise be released, the commissioner shall within thirty (30) days remit the appropriate amount to the operator, with interest, at the rate of six percent (6%) or at the prevailing department of treasury rate, whichever is greater.

Any person, who is aggrieved by a final order of revocation and forfeiture, may appeal the decision to the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 20; 2018, ch. 839, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former §59-8-321, formerly referred to in this section, concerning the former board of reclamation review was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 2(b). The duties of the former board of reclamation review were transferred to the former water quality control board, created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board” for “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas pursuant to former §59-8-321(g)” in (f)(1). See the Compiler’s Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-417. Civil actions. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (b)(1) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

The commissioner may request the attorney general and reporter to institute a civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or any other appropriate order, and venue and jurisdiction for such action shall be in the chancery or circuit court of Davidson County, or the chancery court or circuit court in whose district the surface mining operation is located, the provisions of § 20-4-101 to the contrary notwithstanding, whenever such person, operator, or agent:

Violates or fails or refuses to comply with any cease order issued by the commissioner under this part;

Interferes with, hinders, or delays the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representatives in carrying out this part;

Refuses to admit such authorized representatives to a coal mine;

Refuses to permit inspection of a coal mine by such authorized representatives;

Refuses to furnish any information or report requested by the commissioner in furtherance of this part;

Refuses to permit access to, and copying of, such records as the commissioner determines are necessary in carrying out this part; or

Violates or threatens to violate any of this part, or regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, or a permit issued pursuant to this part, or violates or threatens to violate any cease order or determination promulgated pursuant to this part.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

The commissioner may bring suit for injunctive enforcement of any cease order issued by the commissioner when any cease order has become final as a result of any person's failure to appeal to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas [See the Compiler's Notes], and such person has failed to comply with the cease order.

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

In such suits, all findings of fact contained in the cease order and complaint shall be deemed to be final, and not subject to review except as to receipt of notice of the cease order, but the defendant may proffer evidence showing that the defendant has in fact complied with the commissioner's order.

The cease order issued by the commissioner in such cases shall be presumed to be reasonable and valid, and it shall be presumed that the commissioner has complied with all requirements of the law.

The board may likewise bring suit for enforcement of any cease order issued by it, which has become final either by the failure of any person to appeal the board's cease order or by an appellate court's decision against any person who fails to comply with such final cease order.

In such suits, the board's decision shall not be subject to challenge as to matters of fact, but the violator may proffer evidence showing that the violator has in fact complied with the board's cease order.

Any suit for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or any other appropriate order brought by the commissioner shall be filed and venue and jurisdiction for such action shall be in the chancery court or circuit court of Davidson County, or the chancery court or circuit court in whose district the surface mining operation is located, in which all or a part of the violation is or is about to occur, the provisions of § 20-4-101 to the contrary notwithstanding, in the name of the department by the district attorney general or by the attorney general and reporter at the direction of the commissioner or the board. Such proceedings shall not be tried by jury.

Nothing in this part shall be construed so as to eliminate any additional enforcement rights or procedures which are available under any state law to the commissioner but which are not specifically enumerated herein.

The commissioner may bring suit for injunctive enforcement of any cease order issued by the commissioner when any cease order has become final as a result of any person's failure to appeal to the board, and such person has failed to comply with the cease order.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 21; 2018, ch. 839, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. The duties of the former board of reclamation review, formerly referred to in this section, were transferred to the former water quality control board, created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board” for “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” in (b)(1). See the Compiler’s Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-418. Permit application fees.

Every application for a coal surface mining permit shall be accompanied by a fee of three thousand dollars ($3,000).

Local governmental entities and state agencies are exempted from permit fees.

All permit fees collected pursuant to this part are credited, appropriated and allocated to the department for the administration and enforcement of this part. Any such revenue and any interest thereon which is unexpended or unobligated at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward in a reserve to remain available for expenditure by the department for such administration and enforcement. Such reserve shall not be subject to allotment impoundment and shall be maintained on a no quarter basis.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 22.

59-8-419. Coal purchases — Permit information, etc., required.

It is unlawful for any dealer, broker, or other purchaser to purchase coal from an operator without first being shown such operator's valid coal surface mining permit.

Each dealer, broker or other purchaser shall maintain a record on forms furnished by the commissioner of each purchase of coal, including the date of purchase, the number of tons purchased, the name of the operator, and the operator's permit number, and shall furnish such information to the commissioner at intervals of not less than sixty (60) days.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 23.

59-8-420. Publicly owned mining operations.

Any agency, unit, or instrumentality of state, federal, or local government, including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation of state, federal, or local government, which proposes to engage in mining operations which are subject to the requirements of this part, shall comply with this part; provided, however, that local governmental entities and state agencies shall not be subject to fees or bonds except as otherwise required by this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 24.

59-8-421. Section 66-5-102 unaffected.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to limit or invalidate §66-5-102.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 25.

59-8-222. Civil and criminal penalties — Enforcement — Rights preserved.

59-8-228. Certain exploratory drilling regulated under Mineral Test Hole Regulatory Act exclusively.